Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202613-3301
Act, how cited.

Sections 13-3301 to 13-3316 shall be known and may be cited as the Municipal Inland Port Authority Act.

Laws 2021, LB156, § 1;

Laws 2022, LB998, § 1;

Laws 2024, LB164, § 1.